Washington statutes.
RCW 18.84.040

Powers of secretary—Application of uniform disciplinary act.

(1) In addition to any other authority provided by law, the secretary may:

(a) Adopt rules, in accordance with chapter 34.05 RCW, necessary to implement this chapter;

(b) Set all registration, certification, and renewal fees in accordance with RCW 43.70.250;

(c) Establish forms and procedures necessary to administer this chapter;

(d) Evaluate and designate those schools from which graduation will be accepted as proof of an applicant's eligibility to receive a certificate;

(e) Determine whether alternative methods of training are equivalent to formal education, and to establish forms, procedures, and criteria for evaluation of an applicant's alternative training to determine the applicant's eligibility to receive a certificate;

(f) Issue a certificate to any applicant who has met the education, training, examination, and conduct requirements for certification; and

(g) Issue a registration to an applicant who meets the requirement for a registration.

(2) The secretary may hire clerical, administrative, and investigative staff as needed to implement this chapter.

(3) The uniform disciplinary act, chapter 18.130 RCW, governs the issuance and denial of registrations and certifications, unregistered and uncertified practice, and the discipline of registrants and certificants under this chapter. The secretary is the disciplining authority under this chapter.

[ 2009 c 560 s 17; 2008 c 246 s 4; 1994 sp.s. c 9 s 506; 1991 c 222 s 11; 1991 c 3 s 205; 1987 c 412 s 5.]

NOTES:

Intent—Effective date—Disposition of property and funds—Assignment/delegation of contractual rights or duties—2009 c 560: See notes following RCW 18.06.080.

Severability—Headings and captions not law—Effective date—1994 sp.s. c 9: See RCW 18.79.900 through 18.79.902.